Nebraska, session 109, LB1107.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1107 LB1107
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 39-1638, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
39-1638 For purposes of the Rural Road Improvement District Act,
unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) Persons shall include individuals, corporations, partnerships,
and limited liability companies;
(1) (2) Board, board of county commissioners, or board of county
supervisors means shall mean the governing body of the county; and
(2) District means a rural road improvement district created under
the Rural Road Improvement District Act;
(3) Improvement means shall mean the completed road, or roads, and
all work incidental thereto; and .
(4) Person includes an individual, corporation, partnership, and
limited liability company.
Sec. 2. Section 39-1639, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
39-1639 Any county may establish and construct new roads, change or
extend existing roads, and improve such roads by grading, surfacing,
draining, and incidental work by the board on its own initiative
declaring the advisability or necessity for such establishment,
construction, change, extension, or improvement therefor in a proposed
resolution at a meeting of the board. Such , which resolution shall
state:
(1) The the road or roads to be improved; ,
(2) If if a new road is contemplated, the general location of the
new road or changes in location of an existing road; ,
(3) The the general description of the proposed improvement, and if
the road is to be surfaced, the materials to be used for such
improvement; therefor,
(4) A a rough estimate of the total cost of the improvement, which
may be made by the county surveyor or any engineer or competent person
-2-

LB1107 LB1107
2026 2026
and need not be based on detailed plans and specifications; ,
(5) Proposed proposed method of financing; , and
(6) The the outer boundaries of the district; and in which it is
proposed to levy special assessments.
(7) Whether special assessments will be levied within such district
or the cost of the improvement will be a general charge to the county.
Sec. 3. Section 39-1640, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
39-1640 (1) When a petition is filed with the county clerk signed by
persons owning not less than twenty-five percent of the area in the
proposed district requesting the formation of a district, the board
governing body of the county in which the proposed district is located
shall prepare and propose the resolution as provided in section 39-1639.
(2) Any such The petition shall state the improvements desired and
the property to be included in the district.
Sec. 4. Section 39-1641, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
39-1641 (1) A resolution described in section 39-1639 shall not be
adopted by the board during the same meeting at which such resolution was
proposed.
(2) If special assessments are proposed to be levied in a district,
the The board shall set a time and place for a hearing on the proposed
resolution and give notice of such hearing thereof by publication in a
newspaper of general circulation in the county on the same day each week
during two successive weeks immediately prior to such hearing meeting and
posting such notice in three conspicuous places in the proposed district.
Sec. 5. Section 39-1642, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
39-1642 (1) If special assessments are proposed to be levied in the
proposed district, any person that owns If persons owning more than fifty
percent in area of the real property in the proposed district may file a
-3-

LB1107 LB1107
2026 2026
written objection to the formation of the district. Such written
objection shall:
(a) Include any reason why such person objects to the formation of
such district; and
(b) Be filed with the county clerk prior to the time set for the
hearing pursuant to section 39-1641, if any.
(2) If written objections are filed by one or more persons that own
more than a combined fifty percent in area of the real property in the
proposed district, with the county clerk prior to the time set for
hearing written objections to the formation of the district stating the
reasons for their objections, the resolution proposed under section
39-1639 shall not be passed and no hearing shall be held.
(3) At the hearing, all persons interested in the proposed
improvement shall be given an opportunity to be heard on any matters
affecting the formation of the district or the improvements to be made in
such district therein.
(4) The hearing may be continued from time to time to give
opportunity to ascertain all pertinent information.
(5) At or following such said hearing, or at any subsequent meeting
of the board if no hearing was required, the board may pass the
resolution as proposed, amend the resolution and pass the amended
resolution, or deny passage of the resolution. The amendments may, among
other things, exclude any tracts included in the proposed resolution,
include additional property in the district, or change the boundaries of
the proposed district.
Sec. 6. Section 39-1643, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
39-1643 (1) Upon The board on passing the resolution described in
section 39-1639 that creates a creating the district in which special
assessments will be levied, the board shall appoint an advisory committee
of not less than three persons residing in the district to advise with
-4-

LB1107 LB1107
2026 2026
the board on all matters affecting the road improvement in the district,
financing the cost of the road improvement thereof, and the levy of
special assessments.
(2) The board may from time to time replace any person who resigns
or refuses to act or appoint additional members to the advisory
committee.
(3) The members of the committees shall receive no compensation for
their services, but may be reimbursed for expenses incurred by them in
performing their duties, with reimbursement for mileage to be computed at
the rate provided in section 81-1176, and the amount of such
reimbursement thereof shall be included in the cost of the improvement.
Sec. 7. Section 39-1644, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
39-1644 (1) The district when formed shall be known as Rural Road
Improvement District No. ........ of .................... County.
(2) The district, when established, shall not include any lands
located within a village or city.
(3) The board shall proceed as expeditiously as possible to make
detailed plans for the improvement and improve the roads as generally
outlined in the resolution, but may make such changes in the general plan
of improvement found necessary to make the improvement more adequate. The
improvement may include culverts, bridges, and other drainage work in the
county related to the roads, and the county may construct fences along
the right-of-way or contract with the adjoining owners to move any
existing fences or construct new fences.
(4) The county may:
(a) Obtain obtain any property necessary for the improvement by
gift, purchase, or by eminent domain; .
(b) Accept The county may accept gifts or contributions to assist in
the costs of the improvement;
(c) Contract and may contract with the state or federal government
-5-

LB1107 LB1107
2026 2026
for assistance in making such said improvement and defraying the cost of
such improvement; thereof.
(d) Contract The county may contract for the entire improvement or
any part of such improvement; and thereof or
(e) Purchase may purchase the materials and do part of the work with
its own equipment and employees.
(5) If the work is done by contract, bids shall be taken and the
contract let in the same manner as letting other contracts for county
work.
(6) The county may employ special engineers and special counsel to
assist in the improvement, and their compensation shall be considered as
a part of the cost of the improvement.
Sec. 8. Section 39-1645, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
39-1645 (1) To pay the cost of the improvement as the work
progresses, the county may:
(a) Issue bonds as provided in section 39-1648 and provide for such
payment of costs from bond proceeds; or
(b) Issue issue progress warrants drawn against the rural road
improvement fund for the total cost of materials purchased on receipt of
the materials, for the right-of-way acquired, for engineering and legal
expense, and for other incidental expenses, and for ninety-five percent
of the cost of the work completed and materials necessarily purchased and
delivered for the orderly and proper continuation of the project by the
contractor as certified by the engineer in charge.
(2) On completion of the contract and the acceptance of the
improvement by the county, a warrant may be drawn for the balance due the
contractor. The warrants shall draw interest at the rate set by the
county board.
(3) The county shall pay to the contractor interest, at the rate of
eight percent per annum on the amounts due on partial and final payments,
-6-

LB1107 LB1107
2026 2026
beginning forty-five days after the certification of the amounts due by
the engineer in charge and approval by the board governing body and
running until the date that the warrant is tendered to the contractor.
Sec. 9. Section 39-1646, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
39-1646 (1) A The county that creates a district shall establish:
(a) A a special fund for each district to be known as rural road
improvement district No. ........... fund; or ,
(b) A single rural road improvement fund for all districts in the
county and from which any cost related to a road improvement for any such
district shall be paid.
(2) Such county shall credit to the rural road improvement fund:
(a) Money and credit to said fund all contributions including money
transferred from the county's general fund; ,
(b) All all money collected as special assessments; ,
(c) Special or special levies against the property in the
district; , and
(d) All all money received from the sale of the bonds issued under
the provisions of section 39-1648.
(3) All expenses incurred in connection with the improvement and
that are not paid out of the general fund funds of the county shall be
paid from the by warrants drawn on said rural road improvement fund for
the district.
Sec. 10. Section 39-1647, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
39-1647 (1) On completion and acceptance of the improvement in a
district where special assessments may be levied, the engineer in charge
of the improvement project shall make and file a statement with the
county clerk. Such a statement shall include a description of the
complete cost of the improvements, including interest accruing on the
progress warrants.
-7-

LB1107 LB1107
2026 2026
(2) The board, with the assistance of the advisory committee and
special counsel and engineer in charge of the improvement project, shall:
(a) Determine determine what part of the costs shall be specially
assessed to the property in the district; and
(b) Prepare shall prepare a proposed schedule of assessments against
all properties in the district deemed specially benefited by the
improvements.
(3) Any land in the district may be specially assessed for the
amount it is specially benefited even though the property does not adjoin
the road improved.
(4)(a) The board shall fix a time and place for a meeting when it
will sit as a board of adjustment and equalization and give notice of
such meeting thereof by publication on the same day of each week for two
consecutive weeks immediately prior to the meeting in a newspaper of
general circulation in the county and by mailing a copy of the notice to
each record owner of property proposed to be specially assessed.
(b) At the meeting the board shall equalize and levy the special
assessments.
(5)(a) All special assessments provided for in this section shall be
a lien on the property from date of levy and shall become due fifty days
after date of levy and may be paid within that time without interest. Any
special assessment that is not paid on or before its due date shall be
charged interest on the amount of such special assessment that remains
unpaid. No interest shall accrue prior to the due date for such special
assessment. The rate of interest shall be but if not so paid they shall
bear interest thereafter at a rate established by the board, but shall
not to exceed the rate of interest specified in section 45-104.01, as
such rate may from time to time be adjusted by the Legislature , until
delinquent.
(b) Such assessments shall become delinquent in equal annual
installments over a period of not to exceed ten years as the board may
-8-

LB1107 LB1107
2026 2026
determine at the time of making the levy. Delinquent installments shall
bear interest at the rate specified in section 45-104.01, as such rate
may from time to time be adjusted by the Legislature, until paid and
shall be collected in the usual manner for the collection of taxes.
Sec. 11. Section 39-1648, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
39-1648 (1) The On completion and acceptance of the improvement, the
county may shall issue and sell at not less than par bonds of the county
in an amount sufficient to pay the balance of the costs of the
improvements. Prior to the issuance and sale of such bonds, the county
shall take , taking into account the amounts collected or expected to be
collected on special assessments and any money funds contributed to the
district or otherwise available for the improvement.
(2) Bonds issued under this section The bonds shall:
(a) Mature mature in not to exceed twenty ten years from their date
of issuance and bear interest payable annually or semiannually; and .
(b) Constitute The bonds shall constitute a general obligation of
the county. ,
(3) All but all special assessments levied in the district and all ,
special taxes, or contributions made to the district shall constitute a
sinking fund for the payment of the bonds issued for such district.
(4) The county shall collect all special assessments and special
taxes and levy and collect annually a tax on all taxable property in the
county sufficient in rate and amount to pay any deficiency on the amount
required to pay both principal and interest on the bonds as such bonds
become due. Prior to the levying of any such tax, the county shall take
into account the amounts available for the payment of such bonds in the
sinking fund for the district the same fall due.
(5) The bonds and tax authorized under in this section shall be in
addition to all other bonds and taxes authorized by law and shall not be
included in computing any statutory limitation on the amount of bonds or
-9-

LB1107 LB1107
2026 2026
tax that which may be issued or levied by the county.
Sec. 12. Section 39-1649, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
39-1649 (1) When the road improvements have been completed and
accepted, the roads shall constitute a part of the county road system and
shall be maintained by the county.
(2) The If the owners of more than fifty percent of the area in the
district may petition the board for maintenance in excess of that given
to other similar county roads. If such petition is made, the board may
levy and collect annually a special levy of not to exceed three and five-
tenths cents on each one hundred dollars on all taxable property in the
district subject to section 77-3443.
(3) Money that is collected pursuant to a special levy under this
section The money as collected shall be credited to the rural road
improvement district fund for such district and used only for the repair
and maintenance of the roads in the district where such special levy was
imposed.
Sec. 13. Section 39-1650, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
39-1650 (1) Subsection (2) of this section applies:
(a) When it is When it shall be deemed advisable to enlarge the
boundaries of a district by the advisory committee for a of the district
where special assessments have been or will be imposed; to enlarge the
boundaries thereof, and
(b) If the conditions mentioned in section 39-1639 apply to such
enlarged territory. ,
(2)(a) A a petition for the enlargement of such the district that
is , signed by persons that own owning not less than twenty-five percent
of the territory proposed to be added to the district , may be filed with
the county clerk.
(b) If a petition is filed pursuant to subdivision (a) of this
-10-

LB1107 LB1107
2026 2026
subsection, and thereupon the board shall proceed in all respects as
provided in sections 39-1640 to 39-1643, so far as applicable.
Sec. 14. Section 39-1651, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
39-1651 (1) A petition to withdraw seeking the withdrawal of real
property from a such district may be filed: ,
(a) By signed by persons that own owning not less than twenty-five
percent of the territory in an area that is proposed to be withdrawn; and
(b) If special assessments have been or will be imposed in such
district.
(2) A petition described in subsection (1) of this section shall may
be filed with the county clerk.
(3) If a petition is filed pursuant to this section, the The board
shall set a time and place for a hearing pursuant to as set forth in
sections 39-1641 and 39-1642. At the hearing the board may pass a
resolution permitting the withdrawal of the proposed territory.
(4) Any area withdrawn from the district shall be subject to
assessment and be otherwise chargeable for the payment and discharge of
all the obligations outstanding at the time of filing the petition for
withdrawal.
(5) An area withdrawn from a district shall not be subject to
assessment or otherwise chargeable for any obligations of any nature or
kind incurred after the time of filing the petition for withdrawal of the
area from the district.
Sec. 15. Section 39-1652, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
39-1652 (1) A petition to consolidate two or more districts in a
county may be filed:
(a) By persons that own Upon the filing of a petition with the
county clerk by persons owning not less than twenty-five percent of the
territory of each district in the proposed consolidation; and
-11-

LB1107 LB1107
2026 2026
(b) If special assessments have been or will be imposed in each
district in the proposed consolidation.
(2) A petition described in subsection (1) of this section shall be
filed with the county clerk.
(3) If a petition is filed pursuant to this section, of the county
proposing a consolidation of the districts, the board shall set a time
and place for a hearing pursuant to as set forth in sections 39-1641 and
39-1642. At the hearing the board may pass a resolution consolidating the
districts that are described in the petition petitioning to be
consolidated.
Sec. 16. Section 39-1653, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
39-1653 (1) A petition for dissolution of a district may be filed:
(a) By persons that own Upon the filing of a petition for
dissolution with the county clerk by persons owning not less than twenty-
five percent of the territory of the district; and ,
(b) If special assessments have been or will be imposed in such
district.
(2) A petition described in subsection (1) of this section shall be
filed with the county clerk.
(3) If a petition is filed pursuant to this section, the board shall
set a time and place for a hearing pursuant to as set forth in sections
39-1641 and 39-1642. At the hearing the board may pass a resolution
dissolving the district.
(4) If a district is dissolved pursuant to this section, the The
board shall perform all acts necessary to wind up the affairs of the
district. All funds remaining after discharge of the district's
indebtedness shall be deposited in the general fund of the county.
Sec. 17. Section 39-1655, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
39-1655 Sections 39-1638 to 39-1655 shall be known and may be cited
-12-

LB1107 LB1107
2026 2026
as the Rural Road Improvement District Act.
Sec. 18. Original sections 39-1638, 39-1639, 39-1640, 39-1641,
39-1642, 39-1643, 39-1644, 39-1645, 39-1646, 39-1647, 39-1648, 39-1649,
39-1650, 39-1651, 39-1652, 39-1653, and 39-1655, Reissue Revised Statutes
of Nebraska, are repealed.
Sec. 19. The following section is outright repealed: Section
39-1654, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
-13-